Maryland, session 2026, HB0043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–419.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN
ENTITY THAT:
(I) ENGAGES PROFESSIONALS TO CREATE, EDIT, PRODUCE,
AND DISTRIBUTE ORIGINAL CONTENT CONCERNING MATTERS OF PUBLIC INTEREST
THROUGH REPORTING, CONDUCTING INTERVIEWS, OBSERVING CURRENT EVENTS,
OR ANALYZING INFORMATION;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0043*

HOUSE BILL 43
(II) HAS AT LEAST ONE EMPLOYEE WHO:
1. IS EMPLOYED FULL TIME;
2. IS DEDICATED TO PROVIDING COVERAGE OF EVENTS
IN MARYLAND; AND
3. RESIDES IN MARYLAND OR WITHIN 50 MILES OF
MARYLAND;
(III) IN THE CASE OF A PRINT PUBLICATION, HAS PUBLISHED AT
LEAST ONE PRINT PUBLICATION PER MONTH OVER THE PREVIOUS 12 MONTHS AND:
1. HOLDS A VALID U.S. POSTAL SERVICE PERIODICAL
PERMIT; OR
2. HAS AT LEAST 25% OF ITS CONTENT DEDICATED TO
LOCAL NEWS;
(IV) IN THE CASE OF AN ENTITY THAT PUBLISHES CONTENT
ONLY IN DIGITAL FORM:
1. HAS PUBLISHED AT LEAST ONE PIECE ABOUT EVENTS
IN MARYLAND PER WEEK OVER THE PREVIOUS 12 MONTHS; AND
2. FOR WHICH AT LEAST 33% OF ITS AUDIENCE,
AVERAGED OVER A 12–MONTH PERIOD, IS LOCATED IN MARYLAND;
(V) HAS DISCLOSED, IN ITS PRINT PUBLICATION OR ON ITS
WEBSITE:
1. ITS BENEFICIAL OWNERS; OR
2. IN THE CASE OF A NONPROFIT ENTITY, ITS BOARD OF
DIRECTORS; AND
(VI) IN THE CASE OF AN ENTITY THAT MAINTAINS TAX STATUS
UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, HAS DECLARED COVERAGE
OF LOCAL OR STATE NEWS AS ITS STATED MISSION IN A FILING WITH THE INTERNAL
REVENUE SERVICE.
(2) “LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN ENTITY
THAT RECEIVES MORE THAN 50% OF ITS GROSS RECEIPTS FROM:

HOUSE BILL 43 3
(I) A POLITICAL ORGANIZATION DESCRIBED IN 26 U.S.C. § 527;
OR
(II) ANY ORGANIZATION THAT MAINTAINS STATUS UNDER 26
U.S.C. § 501(C)(4), (5), OR (6).
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO ANY PROCUREMENT CONTRACT FOR
PRINT OR DIGITAL ADVERTISING TO BE PUBLISHED OR BROADCAST OUTSIDE
MARYLAND FOR THE PURPOSES OF:
(1) PROMOTING TOURISM TO THE STATE; OR
(2) EMPLOYEE RECRUITMENT.
(C) A UNIT SHALL STRUCTURE PROCUREMENT PROCEDURES TO ACHIEVE
AN OVERALL GOAL OF 50% OF THE UNIT’S TOTAL DOLLAR VALUE OF PROCUREMENT
CONTRACTS FOR PRINT OR DIGITAL ADVERTISING BEING MADE DIRECTLY TO LOCAL
NEWS ORGANIZATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.